South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3513.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 1, Title 6 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 6-1-780. A local governing body may not impose a penalty, fine, or other additional cost, however described, for late payment of local hospitality tax received within seven days of the due date that in the aggregate exceeds five percent of the delinquent tax. SECTION 2.  Upon approval by the Governor, this act takes effect on the first day of the second month following the month in which the Governor approves this act and applies for local hospitality tax accruing on and after that date. ----XX----